src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-verbs-TV.lexc
LEXICON flex-tv_fleksiver2 !!= * @CODE@ NY 20100227. Til verber, der ikke maa viderederiveres (fx +NIR+Der/vv)
+V+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:%>pakkit K_VOK ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Sg+2SgO+Orth/Alt:%>pagit K_VOK ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Sg+3SgO:%>para K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:%>passi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:%>pakka K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:%>parma K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Sg+3SgO:%>pat K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:%>patsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Sg+3PlO:%>patit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Sg+1SgO:%>paanga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Sg+2SgO:%>paatit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Sg+3SgO:%>paa K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Sg+1PlO:%>paatigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Sg+2PlO:%>paasi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Sg+3PlO:%>pai K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:%>patsigit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Pl+3SgO:%>parput K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:%>passi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:%>pavut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:%>pagut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:%>passinga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Pl+3SgO:%>parsi K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:%>patsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+2Pl+3PlO:%>pasi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+1SgO:%>paannga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+2SgO:%>paatsit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+3SgO:%>paat K ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+1PlO:%>paatigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+2PlO:%>paasi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+3PlO:%>paat K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Ind+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Alt:%>pai K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Sg+1SgO:%>pinga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Sg+3SgO:%>piuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Sg+1PlO:%>pisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Sg+3PlO:%>pigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Pl+1SgO:%>pisinga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Pl+3SgO:%>pisiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Pl+1PlO:%>pisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>pisigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Int+2Pl+3PlO:%>pisigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+2SgO:%>lakkit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+2PlO:%>lassi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+3SgO:%>lara K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+3PlO:%>lakka K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+2SgO:%>latsigit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+2PlO:%>lassi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+3SgO:%>larput K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+3PlO:%>lavut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+1SgO:%>linga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+1PlO:%>lisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+2SgO:%>lisit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+2PlO:%>lisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+3SgO:%>liuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+3PlO:%>ligit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+1SgO:%>linnga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+1PlO:%>lisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+2SgO:%>litsit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+2PlO:%>lisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+3SgO:%>lissuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lisigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+3PlO:%>lisigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Sg+2SgO:%>gakkit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Sg+3SgO:%>gakku K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Sg+4SgO:%>ganni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Sg+2PlO:%>gassi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Sg+3PlO:%>gakkit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Sg+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Sg+1SgO:%>gamma K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Sg+3SgO:%>gakku K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Sg+4SgO:%>ganni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Sg+1PlO:%>gatsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Sg+3PlO:%>gakkit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Sg+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+1SgO:%>manga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+2SgO:%>matit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+3SgO:%>magu K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+4SgO:%>mani K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+1PlO:%>matigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+2PlO:%>masi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+3PlO:%>magit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Sg+4PlO:%>matik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Sg+1SgO:%>gaminga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Sg+2SgO:%>gamisit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Sg+2SgO+Orth/Alt:%>gamitit K ;
+V+Cau+4Sg+3SgO:%>gamiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Sg+1PlO:%>gamisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Sg+1PlO+Orth/Alt:%>gamitigut K ;
+V+Cau+4Sg+2PlO:%>gamisi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Sg+3PlO:%>gamigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+2SgO:%>gatsigit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+3SgO:%>gatsigu K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+4SgO:%>gatsinni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+2PlO:%>gassi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gatsigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+3PlO:%>gatsigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+1Pl+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+1SgO:%>gassinga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+3SgO:%>gassiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+4SgO:%>gassinni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+1PlO:%>gatsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gassigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+3PlO:%>gassigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+2Pl+4PlO:%>gatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+1SgO:%>mannga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+2SgO:%>matsit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+3SgO:%>massuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+4SgO:%>manni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+1PlO:%>matigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+2PlO:%>masi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>matigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+3PlO:%>matigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+3Pl+4PlO:%>matik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+1SgO:%>gaminnga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+2SgO:%>gamitsit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+3SgO:%>gamikku K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+1PlO:%>gamisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+2PlO:%>gamisi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gamikkik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cau+4Pl+3PlO:%>gamikkit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Sg+2SgO:%>gaangakkit K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Sg+3SgO:%>gaangakku K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Sg+4SgO:%>gaanganni K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Sg+2PlO:%>gaangassi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Sg+3PlO:%>gaangakkit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Sg+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Sg+1SgO:%>gaangamma K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Sg+3SgO:%>gaangakku K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Sg+4SgO:%>gaanganni K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Sg+1PlO:%>gaangatsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Sg+3PlO:%>gaangakkit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Sg+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+1SgO:%>gaanganga K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+2SgO:%>gaangatit K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+3SgO:%>gaangagu K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+4SgO:%>gaangani K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+1PlO:%>gaangatigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+2PlO:%>gaangasi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+3PlO:%>gaangagit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Sg+4PlO:%>gaangatik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Sg+1SgO:%>gaangaminga K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Sg+2SgO:%>gaangamisit K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Sg+3SgO:%>gaangamiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Sg+1PlO:%>gaangamisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Sg+2PlO:%>gaangamisi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Sg+3PlO:%>gaangamigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+2SgO:%>gaangatsigit K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+3SgO:%>gaangatsigu K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+4SgO:%>gaangatsinnni K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+2PlO:%>gaangassi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangatsigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+3PlO:%>gaangatsigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+1Pl+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+1SgO:%>gaangassinga K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+3SgO:%>gaangassiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+4SgO:%>gaangassinni K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+1PlO:%>gaangatsigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangassigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+3PlO:%>gaangassigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+2Pl+4PlO:%>gaangatsik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+1SgO:%>gaangannga K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+2SgO:%>gaangatsit K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+3SgO:%>gaangassuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+4SgO:%>gaanganni K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+1PlO:%>gaangatigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+2PlO:%>gaangasi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangatigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+3PlO:%>gaangatigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+3Pl+4PlO:%>gaangatik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+1SgO:%>gaangaminnga K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+2SgO:%>gaangamitsit K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3SgO:%>gaangamikku K ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+1PlO:%>gaangamisigut K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+2PlO:%>gaangamisi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gaangamikkik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+IteCau+4Pl+3PlO:%>gaangamikkit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Sg+2SgO:%>gukkit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Sg+3SgO:%>gukku K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Sg+4SgO:%>gunni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Sg+2PlO:%>gussi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Sg+3PlO:%>gukkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Sg+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Sg+1SgO:%>gumma K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Sg+3SgO:%>gukku K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Sg+4SgO:%>gunni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Sg+1PlO:%>gutsigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Sg+3PlO:%>gukkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Sg+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+1SgO:%>panga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+2SgO:%>patit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+3SgO:%>pagu K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+4SgO:%>pani K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+1PlO:%>patigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+2PlO:%>pasi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+3PlO:%>pagit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Sg+4PlO:%>patik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+1SgO:%>guninga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+2SgO:%>gunisit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+2SgO:%>gunitit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+3SgO:%>guniuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+1PlO:%>gunisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+2PlO:%>gunisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Sg+3PlO:%>gunigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+2SgO:%>gutsigit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+3SgO:%>gutsigu K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+4SgO:%>gutsinnni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+2PlO:%>gussi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gutsigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+3PlO:%>gutsigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+1Pl+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+1SgO:%>gussinga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+3SgO:%>gussiuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+4SgO:%>gussinni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+1PlO:%>gutsigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gussigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+3PlO:%>gussigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+2Pl+4PlO:%>gutsik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+1SgO:%>pannga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+2SgO:%>patsit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+3SgO:%>passuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+4SgO:%>panni K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+1PlO:%>patigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+2PlO:%>pasi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>patigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+3PlO:%>patigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+3Pl+4PlO:%>patik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+1SgO:%>guninnga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+2SgO:%>gunitsit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+3SgO:%>gunikku K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+1PlO:%>gunisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+2PlO:%>gunisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>gunikkik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Con+4Pl+3PlO:%>gunikkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+1SgO:%>lunga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+2SgO:%>lutit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+3SgO:%>lugu K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+4SgO:%>luni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+4SgO+TTAAQ:%>lunissaaq # ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+1Pl+3SgO:%>lutigu K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+2Pl+3SgO:%>lusiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+1PlO:%>luta K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+2PlO:%>lusi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lutigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+1Pl+3PlO:%>lutigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+3PlO:%>lugit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lusigik K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Cont+2Pl+3PlO:%>lusigit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+1SgO:%>nanga K ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+2SgO:%>nak K ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+2SgO:%>natit K ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+1Pl+3SgO:%>natigu K ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+3SgO:%>nagu K ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+3SgO:%>nasiuk K ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+1PlO:%>nata K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+2PlO:%>nasi K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+ContNeg+2Pl+3PlO:%>nasigit K_plur ;
+V+ContNeg+3PlO:%>nagit K_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+2Sg+1SgO:%>gimma K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+3Sg+1SgO:%>gaanga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+2Pl+1SgO:%>gissinga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+3Pl+1SgO:%>gaannga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+1Sg+2SgO:%>gikkit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+3Sg+2SgO:%>gaatit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+1Pl+2SgO:%>gitsigit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+3Pl+2SgO:%>gaatsit K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+1Sg+3SgO:%>giga K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+2Sg+3SgO:%>git K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+3Sg+3SgO:%>gaa K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+4Sg+3SgO:%>ginni K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+1Pl+3SgO:%>gipput K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+2Pl+3SgO:%>gissi K ; !flex-tv
+V+Par+3Pl+3SgO:%>gaat K ; !flex-tv
